Tennessee, session 114, HB1191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
39-17-1901. This part is known and may be cited as the "Anti-Road Rage Act of 2024."
39-17-1902. A person who, while operating, or as a passenger in, a motor vehicle as
defined in § 55-1-103, recklessly discharges a firearm commits a Class E felony.
39-17-1903. A person who, while operating, or as a passenger in, a motor vehicle as
defined in § 55-1-103, recklessly brandishes or displays a firearm commits a Class A
misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1191
003119
- 1 -